California, session 20252026, AB2529.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 910.2 of the Government Code is amended to read:910.2. The claim shall be signed by the claimant or by some person on his behalf. the claimant’s behalf declaring that, upon information and belief, the contents of the claim are true and correct Claims against local public entities for supplies, materials, equipment or services need not be signed by the claimant or on his the claimant’s behalf if presented on a billhead or invoice regularly used in the conduct of the business of the claimant.SECTION 1.Section 448 is added to the Code of Civil Procedure, immediately following Section 446, to read:448.(a)Notwithstanding Section 446, a civil complaint or cross-complaint filed by an employee or former employee of a public agency seeking monetary damages against the public agency for acts or omissions arising out of or relating to the employment relationship shall be verified under penalty of perjury.(b)If the public agency files a motion to strike the complaint or cross-complaint pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 435) on the grounds the complaint or cross-complaint is not verified by the plaintiff or cross-complainant, the court shall grant the motion if the court concludes the complaint or cross-complaint was not verified as required by this section. Notwithstanding Section 436, granting of a motion to strike on the grounds the complaint or cross-complaint is not verified by the plaintiff or cross-complainant is mandatory and is not subject to the court’s discretion.SEC. 2.Section 945.7 is added to the Government Code, to read:945.7.(a)A claim presented in accordance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 900) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 910) of Part 3 by an employee or former employee of a public entity seeking monetary damages against the public entity for acts or omissions arising out of or relating to the employment relationship shall include a declaration signed by the claimant under penalty of perjury verifying the core factual allegations supporting the claim.(b)If the public agency concludes, after investigation of the claim, that there is substantial evidence the person who made the claim committed perjury in signing the claim, the public agency shall make a report presenting that evidence to the appropriate district attorney, and the district attorney may, in their discretion, investigate and take action with respect to the person who filed the claim as it concludes is appropriate.SEC. 3.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.